Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2070.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5043YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 2070 Section 1. Section 308.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The Mississippi river parkway planning commission shall 3 must be composed of ten members appointed by the governor, 4 five members to be appointed for two-year terms beginning 5 July 1, 1959, and five members to be appointed including one 6 member each from Allamakee county, Clayton county, Clinton 7 county, Des Moines county, Dubuque county, Jackson county, Lee 8 county, Louisa county, Muscatine county, and Scott county, 9 for four-year terms beginning July 1, 1959 . In addition , to 10 the above members there shall must be seven four advisory , ex 11 officio members who shall be as follows: 12 a. One member from the state department of transportation 13 commission . 14 b. One member from the natural resource commission. 15 c. One member from the state soil conservation and water 16 quality committee. One member from the economic development 17 authority, whose primary responsibility includes tourism under 18 section 15.108, subsection 5. 19 d. One member from the state historical society of Iowa. 20 e. One member from the faculty of the landscape 21 architectural division of the Iowa state university of science 22 and technology. 23 f. One member from the economic development authority. 24 g. One member from the environmental protection commission. 25 Sec. 2. Section 308.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsections: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. The parkway commission shall submit a 28 report regarding the economic impact of the great river road 29 on this state on or before December 15 each year to the general 30 assembly and to the governor. 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 1B. The parkway commission may establish a 32 technical committee to advise the commission. If established, 33 members of the committee must include at least one employee 34 each from the departments of transportation and agriculture 35 -1- LSB 5043YH (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2070 and land stewardship, from the consumer protection division 1 of the office of the attorney general, and from the economic 2 development authority, designated by the applicable head of the 3 entity. The commission may request any other state agency to 4 designate an employee to serve on the committee. 5